District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Climate Commitment Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 109e of the District Department of the Environment Establishment Act of
2005, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-176; D.C. Official Code § 8-151.09e), is
amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “and appliances by” and inserting
the phrase “and systems by” in its place.
(b) The existing text is designated as paragraph (1).
(c) Paragraph (1) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “water-heating appliances that” and insert the phrase “water-
heating systems that” in its place; and


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
(2) Strike the phrase “the appliance, except” and insert the phrase “the system,
except” in its place.
(d) A new paragraph (2) is added to read as follows:
“(2) This subsection does not apply to the replacement of components of existing
space- or water-heating appliances that rely on the combustion of natural gas, oil, or other fossil
fuels at the site of the system.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire on September 3, 2025.